Arkansas, session 2025, SB442.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 5-5-201(a), concerning certain asset
forfeiture proceedings, is amended to read as follows:
(a) Upon conviction, any conveyance, including an aircraft, motor
vehicle, or vessel, is subject to forfeiture under this subchapter if it is
used in the commission or attempt of:
(1) A burglary;
(2) A robbery;
(3) A theft; or
(4) An arson; or
*CEB072*
04-01-2025 12:43:46 CEB072

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB442
(5) Trafficking of persons, § 5-18-103.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 5-5-202(b)(2), concerning the seizure of
conveyances for certain asset forfeiture proceedings, is amended to read as
follows:
(2) Any law enforcement officer has probable cause to believe
that the conveyance was used in the commission or attempt of:
(A) A burglary;
(B) A robbery;
(C) A theft; or
(D) An arson; or
(E) Trafficking of persons, § 5-18-103.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 5-5-501(d), concerning the impoundment of a
motor vehicle used in a prostitution offense and the assessment of the
impoundment fee, is amended to read as follows:
(d) An impoundment fee assessed under this section shall be collected
by the impounding law enforcement agency and remitted to the Human
Trafficking Victim Support Fund Arkansas Human Trafficking Council Support
Fund on the first business day of each month.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code Title 5, Chapter 5, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 6 — Forfeiture of Property used in Human Trafficking

5-5-601. Forfeiture of assets and disposition of proceeds.
(a) In addition to any other civil or criminal penalties provided by
law, real or personal property used in the commission of a violation of the
Human Trafficking Act of 2013, § 5-18-101 et seq., shall be forfeited as
provided in this subchapter.
(b) Upon conviction for a violation of the Human Trafficking Act of
2013, § 5-18-101 et seq., the following real or personal property is subject
to forfeiture under this subchapter:
(1) A conveyance, including an aircraft, a vehicle, or vessel;
(2) A book, record, telecommunication equipment, or computer;
(3) Money;
04-01-2025 12:43:46 CEB072

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB442
(4) A negotiable instrument or security;
(5) A weapon;
(6) Anything of value furnished, or intended to be furnished, in
exchange for a violation of the Human Trafficking Act of 2013, § 5-18-101 et
seq.;
(7) Any real or personal property acquired or received in a
violation of or as an inducement to violate the Human Trafficking Act of
2013, § 5-18-101 et seq.;
(8) Any real or personal property traceable to proceeds from a
violation of the Human Trafficking Act of 2013, § 5-18-101 et seq.; and
(9) Any real property, including any right, title, and interest
in the whole of or any part of any lot or tract of land used in furtherance
of a violation of the Human Trafficking Act of 2013, § 5-18-101 et seq.

5-5-602. Real or personal property not subject to forfeiture.
(a)(1) Real or personal property used in furtherance of a violation of
the Human Trafficking Act of 2013, § 5-18-101 et seq., shall not be forfeited
under this section unless the real or personal property was used with the
owner's knowledge.
(2) If the confiscating authority has reason to believe that the
real or personal property is leased or rented, the confiscating authority
shall notify the owner of the real or personal property within five (5) days
of the confiscation or within five (5) days of learning that the real or
personal property is leased or rented.
(3) Forfeiture of real or personal property encumbered by a bona
fide security interest is subject to the interest of the secured party if the
secured party did not have knowledge of nor consented to the act or omission
in violation of the Human Trafficking Act of 2013 § 5-18-101 et seq.
(b) No property used by any person as a common carrier in the course
of business as a common carrier is subject to forfeiture under this
subchapter unless it appears that the owner or other person in charge of the
property is a consenting party or privy to a violation of the Human
Trafficking Act of 2013, § 5-18-101 et seq.

5-5-603. Seizure of real or personal property.
(a) Real or personal property subject to forfeiture under this
04-01-2025 12:43:46 CEB072

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB442
subchapter may be seized by any law enforcement agent upon process issued by
any circuit court having jurisdiction over the real or personal property on
petition filed by the prosecuting attorney of the judicial circuit.
(b) Seizure without process may be made if:
(1) The seizure is incident to an arrest or a search under a
search warrant or an inspection under an administrative inspection warrant;
(2) The real or personal property subject to seizure has been
the subject of a prior judgment in favor of the state in a criminal
injunction or forfeiture proceeding based upon this subchapter;
(3) The seizing law enforcement agency has probable cause to
believe that the real or personal property is directly or indirectly
dangerous to health or safety; or
(4) The seizing law enforcement agency has probable cause to
believe that the real or personal property was used in the commission or
attempt of a violation of the Human Trafficking Act of 2013, § 5-18-101 et
seq.

5-5-604. Transfer of real or personal property seized by state or
local agency to federal agency.
(a) A state or local law enforcement agency shall not transfer real or
personal property seized by the state or local agency to any federal entity
for forfeiture under federal law unless the circuit court having jurisdiction
over the property enters an order, upon petition by the prosecuting attorney,
authorizing the property to be transferred to the federal entity.
(b) A transfer under subsection (a) of this section shall not be
approved unless it reasonably appears that the activity giving rise to the
investigation or seizure involves more than one (1) state or the nature of
the investigation or seizure would be better pursued under federal law.

5-5-605. Custody of real or personal property pending disposition.
(a) Real or personal property seized for forfeiture under this
subchapter is not subject to replevin, but is deemed to be in the custody of
the seizing law enforcement agency subject only to an order or decree of the
circuit court having jurisdiction over the property seized.
(b) Subject to any need to retain the real or personal property as
evidence, when real or personal property is seized under this subchapter the
04-01-2025 12:43:46 CEB072

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB442
seizing law enforcement agency shall:
(1) Remove the personal property to a place designated by the
circuit court;
(2) Place the real property under constructive seizure by
posting notice of pending forfeiture on it, by giving notice of pending
forfeiture to its owners and interest holders, or by filing notice of pending
forfeiture in any appropriate public record relating to the real property;
(3) Remove the personal property to a storage area for
safekeeping or, if the personal property is a negotiable instrument or money,
or is not needed for evidentiary purposes, deposit it in an interest-bearing
account; or
(4) Provide for another agency or custodian, including an owner,
secured party, mortgagee, or lienholder, to take custody of the real or
personal property and service, maintain, and operate it as reasonably
necessary to maintain its value in any appropriate location within the
jurisdiction of the court.
(c)(1) In any transfer of real or personal property under § 5-5-604, a
transfer receipt shall be prepared by the transferring law enforcement
agency.
(2) The transfer receipt shall:
(A) List a detailed and complete description of the real
or personal property being transferred;
(B) State to which federal agency the real or personal
property is being transferred and the source or authorization for the
transfer; and
(C) Be signed by both the transferor and the transferee.
(3) Both transferor and transferee shall maintain a copy of the
transfer receipt.
(d) A person who acts as custodian of real or personal property under
this section is not liable to any person on account of an act done in a
reasonable manner in compliance with an order under this subchapter.

5-5-606. Inventory of real or personal property seized — Referral to
prosecuting attorney — Failure to file confiscation report.
(a) Real or personal property seized by a state or local law
enforcement officer who is attached to, deputized or commissioned by, or
04-01-2025 12:43:46 CEB072

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB442
working in conjunction with a federal agency remains subject to the
provisions of this section.
(b)(1) When real or personal property is seized for forfeiture by a
law enforcement agency, the seizing law enforcement officer shall prepare and
sign a confiscation report.
(2)(A) The person from whom the real or personal property is
seized shall sign the confiscation report if present and shall immediately
receive a copy of the confiscation report.
(B) If the person refuses to sign the confiscation report,
the confiscation report shall be signed by one (1) additional law enforcement
officer, stating that the person refused to sign the confiscation report.
(3)(A) The original confiscation report shall be filed with the
seizing law enforcement agency within forty-eight (48) hours after the
seizure and maintained in a separate file.
(B) One (1) copy of the confiscation report shall be
retained by the seizing law enforcement officer.
(4) The confiscation report shall contain the following
information:
(A) A detailed description of the real or personal
property seized including without limitation any serial number, model number,
and odometer reading or hour reading of a vehicle or equipment;
(B) The date of seizure;
(C) The name and address of the person from whom the real
or personal property was seized;
(D) The reason for the seizure;
(E) Where the personal property will be held;
(F) The seizing law enforcement officer's name; and
(G) A signed statement by the seizing law enforcement
officer stating that the confiscation report is true and complete.
(5) Within three (3) business days of receiving the confiscation
report, the seizing law enforcement agency shall forward a copy of the
confiscation report to the prosecuting attorney for the district where the
real or personal property was seized and to the Human Trafficking
Coordinator.
(c)(1) Arkansas Legislative Audit shall notify the Human Trafficking
Coordinator and a circuit court in the county of a law enforcement agency,
04-01-2025 12:43:46 CEB072

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB442
prosecuting attorney, or other public entity that the law enforcement agency,
prosecuting attorney, or public entity is ineligible to receive any forfeited
funds, forfeited real or personal property, or any grants from the Arkansas
Human Trafficking Council Support Fund, if Arkansas Legislative Audit
determines, by its own investigation or upon written notice from the Human
Trafficking Coordinator, that:
(A) The law enforcement agency has failed to complete and
file the confiscation report as required by this section; or
(B) The law enforcement agency, prosecuting attorney, or
public entity has not properly accounted for any seized real or personal
property.
(2) After the notice by Arkansas Legislative Audit under
subdivision (c)(1) of this section, the circuit court shall not issue any
order distributing seized real or personal property to that law enforcement
agency, prosecuting attorney, or public entity nor shall any grant be awarded
by the Human Trafficking Operations Unit of the Division of Arkansas State
Police to that law enforcement agency, prosecuting attorney, or public entity
until:
(A) The appropriate officials of the law enforcement
agency, prosecuting attorney, or public entity have appeared before the
Legislative Joint Auditing Committee; and
(B) The Legislative Joint Auditing Committee has adopted a
motion authorizing subsequent transfers of forfeited real or personal
property to the law enforcement agency, prosecuting attorney, or public
entity.
(3)(A) While a law enforcement agency, prosecuting attorney, or
other public entity is ineligible to receive forfeited real or personal
property, the circuit court shall order any money that would have been
distributed to that law enforcement agency, prosecuting attorney, or public
entity to be transmitted to the Treasurer of State for deposit into the
Arkansas Human Trafficking Council Support Fund.
(B) If the real or personal property is not cash, the
circuit court shall order the real or personal property converted to cash by
selling the real or personal property under § 5-5-608(a)(2) and the proceeds
transmitted to the Treasurer of State for deposit into the Arkansas Human
Trafficking Council Support Fund.
04-01-2025 12:43:46 CEB072

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB442
(4) Moneys deposited into the Arkansas Human Trafficking Council
Support Fund pursuant to subdivision (c)(3) of this section are not subject
to recovery or retrieval by the ineligible law enforcement agency,
prosecuting attorney, or other public entity.
(d) The Human Trafficking Coordinator shall make available a
standardized confiscation report form to be used by all law enforcement
agencies with specific instructions and guidelines concerning the type and
monetary value of all real or personal property, including weapons, to be
included in the confiscation report and forwarded to the office of the local
prosecuting attorney and the Human Trafficking Coordinator under subdivision
(b)(5) of this section.

5-5-607. Initiation of forfeiture proceedings — Notice to claimants —
Judicial proceedings.
(a)(1) A prosecuting attorney shall initiate a forfeiture proceeding
under this subchapter by filing a complaint with the circuit clerk of the
county where the real or personal property was seized and by serving the
complaint on all known owners and interest holders of the seized property in
accordance with the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure.
(2) The complaint may be based on in rem or in personam
jurisdiction but shall not be filed in such a way as to avoid the
distribution requirements set forth in § 5-5-609.
(3) The prosecuting attorney shall mail a copy of the complaint
to the Human Trafficking Coordinator within five (5) calendar days after
filing the complaint.
(4) The complaint shall include a copy of the confiscation
report and shall be filed within sixty (60) days after receiving a copy of
the confiscation report from the seizing law enforcement agency.
(5) In a case involving real property, the complaint shall be
filed within sixty (60) days of the defendant's conviction on the charge
giving rise to the forfeiture.
(6)(A) The complaint may be filed after the expiration of the
time set forth in subdivision (b)(1) of this section only if the complaint is
accompanied by a statement of good cause for the late filing.
(B) However, in no event shall the complaint be filed more
than one hundred twenty (120) days after either the date of the seizure or,
04-01-2025 12:43:46 CEB072

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB442
in a case involving real property, the date of the defendant's conviction.
(C)(i) If the circuit court determines that good cause has
not been established, the circuit court shall order that the seized real or
personal property be returned to the owner or interest holder.
(ii) In addition to the requirements in subdivision
(a)(6)(C)(i) of this section, real or personal property seized but not
subject to forfeiture under this subchapter or subject to disposition
pursuant to law or the Arkansas Rules of Criminal Procedure may be ordered
returned to the owner or interest holder.
(iii) If the owner or interest holder cannot be
determined, the court may order disposition of the real or personal property
as provided in § 5-5-608.
(b)(1) Subject to the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure, a defendant
who was arrested for an offense in violation of the Human Trafficking Act of
2013, § 5-18-101 et seq. shall file with the circuit clerk an answer to the
complaint that shall include:
(A) A statement describing the seized real or personal
property and the owner's or interest holder's interest in the seized real or
personal property, with supporting documents to establish the owner's or
interest holder's interest;
(B) A certification by the owner or interest holder
stating that he or she has read the answer and that it is not filed for any
improper purpose;
(C) A statement setting forth any defense to forfeiture;
and
(D) The address at which the owner or interest holder
accepts mail.
(2) Subject to the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure, a
defendant who is a third party who was not arrested for an offense giving
rise to a forfeiture action under this subchapter shall file an answer to the
complaint with the circuit clerk within forty-five (45) days of service of
process.
(c)(1) If the owner or interest holder fails to file an answer as
required by subsection (b) of this section, the prosecuting attorney may move
for default judgment pursuant to the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure.
(2) If a timely answer is filed:
04-01-2025 12:43:46 CEB072

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB442
(A) By a defendant who was arrested for an offense giving
rise to the forfeiture action under this section, the prosecuting attorney
shall prove by a preponderance of the evidence that the seized real or
personal property should be forfeited; or
(B) By a third party who was not arrested for an offense
giving rise to the forfeiture action, the prosecuting attorney shall prove by
clear and convincing evidence that the seized real or personal property
should be forfeited.
(3)(A) After the prosecuting attorney has presented proof under
subdivision (c)(2) of this section, any owner or interest holder of the real
or personal property seized may present evidence why the seized real or
personal property should not be forfeited.
(B) If the circuit court determines that grounds for
forfeiting the seized real or personal property exist and that no defense to
forfeiture has been established by the owner or interest holder, the circuit
court shall enter an order under § 5-5-608.
(C) If the circuit court determines that the prosecuting
attorney has failed to establish that grounds for forfeiture of the seized
real or personal property exist or that the owner or interest holder has
established a defense to the forfeiture, the court shall order that the
seized real or personal property be immediately returned to the owner or
interest holder.

5-5-608. Final disposition.
(a) When a circuit court having jurisdiction over real or personal
property seized under this subchapter finds that grounds for a forfeiture
exist and the burden of proof has been met under § 5-5-607, the circuit court
shall enter an order:
(1) Permitting the law enforcement agency or prosecuting
attorney to retain the seized personal property for law enforcement or
prosecutorial purposes subject to subsection (b) of this section;
(2) Directing the retaining law enforcement agency or
prosecuting attorney to sell at public sale, under § 5-5-101(e) and (f), the
seized real or personal property that is not required by law to be destroyed
and that is not harmful to the public; or
(3) Transferring a motor vehicle to a school district for use in
04-01-2025 12:43:46 CEB072

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB442
a driver education course.
(b)(1) Seized personal property that is retained by the law
enforcement agency or prosecuting attorney under subdivision (a)(1) of this
section shall not be retained for official use for more than two (2) years,
unless the circuit court finds that the seized property has been used for law
enforcement or prosecutorial purposes and authorizes continued use for those
purposes on an annual basis.
(2) Except as provided in subdivision (b)(1) of this section, no
later than two (2) years after entry of an order under subdivision (a)(1) of
this section, the seized personal property shall be sold as provided in
subdivision (a)(2) of this section, and the proceeds shall be deposited:
(A) Eighty percent (80%) into the human trafficking
control fund of the retaining law enforcement agency or prosecuting attorney;
and
(B) Twenty percent (20%) into the State Treasury as
special revenues to be credited to the Arkansas Human Trafficking Council
Support Fund.
(3) The retaining law enforcement agency or prosecuting attorney
may sell the retained seized personal property at any time during the time
allowed for retention, and the proceeds of the sale shall be distributed as
set forth in subdivisions (b)(2)(A) and (B) of this section.
(4) If the circuit court determines that retained seized
personal property has been used for personal use or by non-law enforcement
personnel for non-law enforcement purposes, the circuit court shall order the
seized personal property to be sold at public sale under § 5-5-101(e) and
(f), and the proceeds shall be deposited into the State Treasury as special
revenues to be credited to the Arkansas Human Trafficking Council Support
Fund.
(5)(A) A law enforcement agency may use seized personal property
or money if the circuit court's order specifies that the seized personal
property or money may be retained for official use by the prosecuting
attorney, county sheriff, chief of police, Division of Arkansas State Police,
or Arkansas Highway Police Division of the Arkansas Department of
Transportation.
(B) If the circuit court’s order specifies that the seized
personal property or money may be retained for official use, the prosecuting
04-01-2025 12:43:46 CEB072

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB442
attorney, county sheriff, chief of police, Division of Arkansas State Police,
or Arkansas Highway Police Division of the Arkansas Department of
Transportation shall:
(i) Maintain an inventory of the seized personal
property or money;
(ii) Be accountable for the seized personal property
or money; and
(iii) Be subject to the provisions of § 5-5-606(c)
with respect to the seized personal property or money.
(6) Any weapon not retained for official use shall be disposed
of in accordance with state and federal law.
(c) Disposition of seized real or personal property under this section
is subject to the need to retain the seized real or personal property as
evidence in any related proceeding.
(d) Within three (3) business days of the entry of an order, the
circuit clerk shall forward to the Human Trafficking Coordinator copies of
the confiscation report, the circuit court's order, and any other
documentation detailing the disposition of the seized real or personal
property.

5-5-609. Disposition of moneys received.
(a)(1) Subject to the provisions of § 5-5-606, the proceeds of sales
conducted pursuant to § 5-5-608 and any moneys forfeited or obtained by
judgment or settlement under this subchapter shall be deposited and
distributed in the manner set forth in this section.
(2) Moneys received from a federal forfeiture shall be deposited
and distributed under subsection (f) of this section.
(b) The proceeds of any sale and any moneys forfeited or obtained by
judgment or settlement under this subchapter shall be deposited into the
asset forfeiture fund of the prosecuting attorney and is subject to the
following provisions:
(1) During a calendar year, if the the aggregate amount of
moneys deposited into the asset forfeiture fund exceeds twenty thousand
dollars ($20,000) per county, within fourteen (14) days of the time of the
excess the prosecuting attorney shall notify the circuit judges in the
judicial district and the Human Trafficking Coordinator;
04-01-2025 12:43:46 CEB072

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB442
(2) After the notification required under subdivision (b)(1) of
this section, twenty percent (20%) of the proceeds of any additional sale and
any additional moneys forfeited or obtained by judgment or settlement under
this subchapter in the same calendar year shall be deposited into the State
Treasury as special revenues to be credited to the Arkansas Human Trafficking
Council Support Fund, and the remainder shall be deposited into the asset
forfeiture fund of the prosecuting attorney;
(3) Failure of the prosecuting attorney to comply with the
notification requirement under subdivision (b)(1) of this section renders the
prosecuting attorney and any entity eligible to receive forfeited moneys or
property from the prosecuting attorney ineligible to receive forfeited moneys
or property, except as provided in § 5-5-606; and
(4) Twenty percent (20%) of any moneys in excess of twenty
thousand dollars ($20,000) that have been retained but not reported as
required by subdivision (b)(1) of this section are subject to recovery for
deposit into the State Treasury as special revenues to be credited to the
Arkansas Human Trafficking Council Support Fund.
(c)(1) The prosecuting attorney shall administer expenditures from the
asset forfeiture fund, which is subject to audit by Arkansas Legislative
Audit.
(2) Moneys distributed from the asset forfeiture fund shall only
be used for law enforcement and prosecutorial purposes and moneys in the
asset forfeiture fund shall be distributed in the following order:
(A) For satisfaction of any bona fide security interest or
lien;
(B) For payment of any proper expense of the proceeding
for forfeiture and sale, including expenses of seizure, maintenance of
custody, advertising, and court costs;
(C) Any balance under two hundred fifty thousand dollars
($250,000) shall be distributed proportionally to reflect generally the
contribution of the appropriate local or state law enforcement or
prosecutorial agency's participation in any activity that led to the seizure
or forfeiture of the property or deposit of moneys under this subchapter; and
(D) Any balance over two hundred fifty thousand dollars
($250,000) resulting from the seizure or forfeiture of property or deposit of
moneys under this subchapter shall be forwarded to the Human Trafficking
04-01-2025 12:43:46 CEB072

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB442
Coordinator to be transferred to the State Treasury for deposit into the
Arkansas Human Trafficking Support Fund.
(d)(1) For a forfeiture in an amount greater than two hundred fifty
thousand dollars ($250,000) from which expenses are paid for a proceeding for
forfeiture and sale under subdivision (c)(2)(B) of this section, an itemized
accounting of the expenses shall be delivered to the Human Trafficking
Coordinator within ten (10) calendar days after the payment of the expenses.
(2) The itemized accounting shall include the expenses paid, to
whom paid, and for what purposes the expenses where paid.
(e)(1)(A) There is created on the books of each law enforcement agency
and prosecuting attorney a human trafficking control fund.
(B) The human trafficking control fund shall consist of
any moneys obtained under subsection (b) of this section and any other
revenue as may be provided by law or ordinance.
(C) Moneys in the human trafficking control fund:
(i) May not supplant other local, state, or federal
funds;
(ii) Are appropriated on a continuing basis and are
not subject to the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 et seq.; and
(iii) Shall only be used for law enforcement and
prosecutorial purposes, including without limitation to provide a grant of up
to one thousand dollars ($1,000) to the family of a law enforcement officer
who dies in the prosecuting attorney's jurisdiction.
(D) The human trafficking control fund is subject to audit
by Arkansas Legislative Audit.
(2) A law enforcement agency and prosecuting attorney shall
submit to the Human Trafficking Coordinator on or before January 1 and July 1
of each year a report detailing any moneys received and expenditure made from
the human trafficking control fund during the preceding six-month period.
(f)(1) Any moneys received by a prosecuting attorney or law
enforcement agency from a federal forfeiture shall be deposited and
maintained in a separate account subject to the following provisions:
(A) Any balance over two hundred fifty thousand dollars
($250,000) in the separate account shall be distributed as set forth in
subdivision (f)(2) of this section;
(B) No other moneys maybe maintained in the separate
04-01-2025 12:43:46 CEB072

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB442
account except for any interest income generated by the separate account;
(C) Moneys in the separate account shall only be used for
law enforcement and prosecutorial purposes consistent with governing federal
law; and
(D) The separate account is subject to audit by Arkansas
Legislative Audit.
(2) Any balance over two hundred fifty thousand dollars
($250,000) shall be forwarded to the Division of Arkansas State Police to be
transferred to the State Treasury for deposit into the Human Trafficking
Council Support Fund in which the balance shall be maintained separately and
distributed consistent with governing federal law.

5-5-610. In personam proceedings.
(a) In personam jurisdiction may be based on a defendant's presence in
the state, or on his or her conduct in the state, as set out in § 16-4-
101(B), and is subject to the provisions of subsection (b) of this section.
(b)(1) A temporary restraining order under this section may be entered
ex parte on application of the state, upon a showing that:
(A) There is probable cause to believe that the property
with respect to which the order is sought is subject to forfeiture under this
section; and
(B) Notice of the action would jeopardize the availability
of the property for forfeiture.
(2) Notice of the entry of a temporary restraining order and an
opportunity for a hearing shall be afforded to a person known to have an
interest in the real or personal property.
(3) A hearing under subdivision (b)(2) of this section shall be
held at the earliest possible date consistent with Rule 65 of the Arkansas
Rules of Civil Procedure and is limited to the issues of whether:
(A) There is a probability that the state will prevail on
the issue of forfeiture and that failure to enter the temporary restraining
order will result in the real or personal property being destroyed, conveyed,
alienated, encumbered, disposed of, received, removed from the jurisdiction
of the circuit court, concealed, or otherwise made unavailable for
forfeiture; and
(B) The need to preserve the availability of real or
04-01-2025 12:43:46 CEB072

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB442
personal property through the entry of the temporary restraining order
outweighs the hardship on any owner or interest holder against whom the
temporary restraining order is to be entered.
(c) The state has the burden of proof by a preponderance of the
evidence to show that the defendant's real or personal property is subject to
forfeiture.
(d)(1) After a determination of liability of a person for conduct
giving rise to forfeiture under this subchapter, the circuit court shall
enter a judgment of forfeiture of the real or personal property subject to
forfeiture as alleged in the complaint and may authorize the prosecuting
attorney or any law enforcement officer to seize any real or personal
property subject to forfeiture under § 5-5-601 not previously seized or not
then under seizure.
(2) The order of forfeiture shall be consistent with § 5-5-608.
(3) In connection with the judgment, on application of the
state, the circuit court may enter any appropriate order to protect the
interest of the state in the forfeited property.
(e) Subsequent to the finding of liability and order of forfeiture,
the following procedures apply:
(1) The prosecuting attorney shall give notice of pending
forfeiture, in the manner provided in Rule 4 of the Arkansas Rules of Civil
Procedure, to any owner or interest holder who has not previously been given
notice;
(2) An owner of or interest holder in the real or personal
property that has been ordered forfeited and whose claim is not precluded may
file a claim within thirty (30) days after initial notice of pending
forfeiture or after notice under Rule 4 of the Arkansas Rules of Civil
Procedure, whichever is earlier; and
(3) The circuit court may amend the in personam order of
forfeiture if the circuit court determines that a claimant has established
that he or she has an interest in the real or personal property and that the
interest is exempt under § 5-5-602.

5-5-611. Forfeiture of absent, encumbered, or indivisible real or
personal property.
The circuit court shall order the forfeiture of any other real or
04-01-2025 12:43:46 CEB072

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB442
personal property of an owner or defendant up to the value of the owner's or
defendant's real or personal property found by the circuit court to be
subject to forfeiture under this subchapter if any of the forfeitable real or
personal property had remained under the control or custody of the owner or
defendant and the forfeitable real or personal property:
(1) Cannot be located;
(2) Was transferred or conveyed to, sold to, or deposited with a
third party;
(3) Is beyond the jurisdiction of the circuit court;
(4) Substantially diminished in value while not in the actual
physical custody of the seizing law enforcement agency;
(5) Was commingled with other property that cannot be divided
without difficulty; or
(6) Is subject to any interest exempted from forfeiture under §
5-5-602.

5-5-612. Conviction required — Exceptions.
(a) There shall be no civil judgment under this subchapter and no
property shall be forfeited unless the person from whom the property is
seized is convicted of a felony offense under the Human Trafficking Act of
2013, § 5-18-101 et seq., that related to the property being seized and that
permits the forfeiture of the property.
(b) The court may waive the conviction requirement under this section
if the prosecuting attorney shows by clear and convincing evidence that,
before a conviction, the person from whom the property was seized:
(1) Died;
(2) Was deported by the United States Government;
(3) Was granted immunity or reduced punishment in exchange for
testifying or assisting a law enforcement agency or prosecution;
(4) Fled the jurisdiction or failed to appear on the underlying
criminal charge;
(5) Failed to answer the complaint for civil asset forfeiture
under § 5-64-505 as specified in the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure;
(6) Abandoned or disclaimed his or her ownership interest in the real
or personal property seized; or
(7) Agreed in writing with the prosecuting attorney and other
04-01-2025 12:43:46 CEB072

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB442
parties as to the disposition of the real or personal property.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 5-18-103(d)(2), concerning the additional
fine payment upon conviction for trafficking of persons, is amended to read
as follows:
(2) Fine payments received under subdivision (d)(1) of this
section shall be deposited as follows:
(A) Fifty percent (50%) into the Safe Harbor Fund for
Sexually Exploited Children; and
(B) Fifty percent (50%) into the Human Trafficking Victim
Support Fund into the Arkansas Human Trafficking Council Support Fund.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 5-18-104(c)(2), concerning the additional
fine payment upon conviction for patronizing a victim of human trafficking,
is amended to read as follows:
(2) Fine payments received under subdivision (c)(1) of this
section shall be deposited as follows:
(A) Fifty percent (50%) into the Safe Harbor Fund for
Sexually Exploited Children ; and
(B) Fifty percent (50%) into the Human Trafficking Victim
Support Fund into the Arkansas Human Trafficking Council Support Fund.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 5-18-106(c)(2), concerning the additional
fine payment upon conviction for grooming a minor for future sex trafficking,
is amended to read as follows:
(2) Fine payments received under subdivision (c)(1) of this
section shall be deposited as follows:
(A) Fifty percent (50%) into the Safe Harbor Fund for
Sexually Exploited Children; and
(B) Fifty percent (50%) into the Human Trafficking Victim
Support Fund into the Arkansas Human Trafficking Council Support Fund.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 5-18-107(f)(2), concerning the additional
fine payment upon conviction for traveling for the purpose of an unlawful sex
act with a minor, is amended to read as follows:
(2) Fine payments received under subdivision (f)(1) of this
04-01-2025 12:43:46 CEB072

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB442
section shall be deposited as follows:
(A) Fifty percent (50%) into the Safe Harbor Fund for
Sexually Exploited Children; and
(B) Fifty percent (50%) into the Human Trafficking Victim
Support Fund into the Arkansas Human Trafficking Council Support Fund.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code Title 5, Chapter 27, Subchapter 2, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
5-27-234. Harboring an endangered runaway minor.
(a) A person commits the offense of harboring an endangered runaway
minor if he or she knowingly harbors a minor who is an endangered runaway
minor for a period of at least seventy-two (72) hours.
(b) Harboring an endangered runaway minor is a:
(1) Class A misdemeanor for a first offense; and
(2) Class D felony for a second or subsequent offense.
(c)(1) In addition to any other sentence authorized by this section, a
person who violates this section upon conviction shall be ordered to pay a
fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000).
(2) Fine payments received under subdivision (c)(1) of this
section shall be deposited one hundred percent (100%) into the Arkansas Human
Trafficking Council Support Fund.
(d) As used in this section, “endangered runaway minor” means an
unemancipated minor who is voluntarily absent from his or her home for at
least seventy-two (72) hours without a compelling reason and without the
consent of his or her custodial parent, guardian, or legal custodian.
(e) It is an affirmative defense to prosecution under this section
that a person acted in good faith to protect the welfare, safety, or health
of the minor, and that he or she:
(1) Promptly notified law enforcement, child protective
services, or another relevant authority upon discovering that the minor was
an endangered runaway minor;
(2) Provided temporary care or shelter solely to protect the
minor from imminent harm; or
(3) Did not have a purpose to interfere with the lawful custody
or rights of a custodial parent or legal guardian of the minor.

04-01-2025 12:43:46 CEB072

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB442
SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 5-70-102(e)(2), concerning the additional
fine payment upon conviction for prostitution, is amended to read as follows:
(2) Fine payments received under subdivision (e)(1) of this
section shall be deposited as follows:
(A) Fifty percent (50%) into the Safe Harbor Fund for
Sexually Exploited Children; and
(B) Fifty percent (50%) into the Human Trafficking Victim
Support Fund into the Arkansas Human Trafficking Council Support Fund.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 5-70-103 is amended to read as follows:
5-70-103. Sexual solicitation.
(a) A person commits the offense of sexual solicitation if he or she:
(1) Offers or agrees to pay a fee to a person to engage in
sexual activity with him or her or another person; or
(2) Solicits or requests a person to engage in sexual activity
with him or her in return for a fee.
(b) Sexual solicitation is an unclassified misdemeanor with the
following sentences: a:
(1) For a first offense:
(A) No more than ninety (90) days' imprisonment;
(B) A fine of no more than two thousand dollars ($2,000);
or
(C) Both imprisonment and a fine; and
(2) For a second or subsequent offense:
(A) No more than one (1) year of imprisonment;
(B) A fine of no more than three thousand five hundred
dollars ($3,500); or
(C) Both imprisonment and a fine.
(1) Class A misdemeanor for a first offense; and
(2) Class D felony for a second or subsequent offense.
(c) It is an affirmative defense to prosecution under this section
that the person engaged in an act of sexual solicitation as a result of being
a victim of trafficking of persons, § 5-18-103.
(d)(1) In addition to any other sentence authorized by this section, a
person who violates this section by offering to pay, agreeing to pay, or
paying a fee to engage in sexual activity upon conviction shall be ordered to
04-01-2025 12:43:46 CEB072

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB442
pay a fine of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).
(2) Fine payments received under subdivision (d)(1) of this
section shall be deposited as follows:
(A) Fifty percent (50%) into the Safe Harbor Fund for
Sexually Exploited Children; and
(B) Fifty percent (50%) into the Human Trafficking Victim
Support Fund into the Arkansas Human Trafficking Council Support Fund.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 5-70-104(c)(2), concerning the additional
fine payment upon conviction for promoting prostitution in the first degree,
is amended to read as follows:
(2) Fine payments received under subdivision (c)(1) of this
section shall be deposited as follows:
(A) Fifty percent (50%) into the Safe Harbor Fund for
Sexually Exploited Children; and
(B) Fifty percent (50%) into the Human Trafficking Victim
Support Fund into the Arkansas Human Trafficking Council Support Fund.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 5-70-105(c)(2), concerning the additional
fine payment upon conviction for promoting prostitution in the second degree,
is amended to read as follows:
(2) Fine payments received under subdivision (c)(1) of this
section shall be deposited as follows:
(A) Fifty percent (50%) into the Safe Harbor Fund for
Sexually Exploited Children; and
(B) Fifty percent (50%) into the Human Trafficking Victim
Support Fund into the Arkansas Human Trafficking Council Support Fund.

SECTION 14. Arkansas Code § 5-70-106(c)(2), concerning the additional
fine payment upon conviction for promoting prostitution in the third degree,
is amended to read as follows:
(2) Fine payments received under subdivision (c)(1) of this
section shall be deposited as follows:
(A) Fifty percent (50%) into the Safe Harbor Fund for
Sexually Exploited Children; and
(B) Fifty percent (50%) into the Human Trafficking Victim
04-01-2025 12:43:46 CEB072

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB442
Support Fund into the Arkansas Human Trafficking Council Support Fund.

SECTION 15. Arkansas Code § 5-70-107(e)(2), concerning the additional
fine payment upon conviction for sexual solicitation of a minor, is amended
to read as follows:
(2) Fine payments received under subdivision (e)(1) of this
section shall be deposited as follows:
(A) Fifty percent (50%) into the Safe Harbor Fund for
Sexually Exploited Children; and
(B) Fifty percent (50%) into the Human Trafficking Victim
Support Fund into the Arkansas Human Trafficking Council Support Fund.

SECTION 16. Arkansas Code § 5-70-107, concerning the offense of sexual
solicitation of a minor, is amended to add an additional subsection to read
as follows:
(f) A person who violates this section upon conviction shall be
ordered to attend an education or treatment program for the prevention of sex
offenses and rehabilitation of sex offenders approved by the Human
Trafficking Operations Unit of the Division of Arkansas State Police.

Section 17. Arkansas Code § 12-19-101 is repealed.
12-19-101. State Task Force for the Prevention of Human Trafficking.
(a)(1) The Attorney General may establish a State Task Force for the
Prevention of Human Trafficking.
(2) The task force shall address all aspects of human
trafficking, including sex trafficking and labor trafficking of both United
States citizens and foreign nationals.
(b) If established, representatives on the task force shall be
appointed by the Attorney General and may include representatives from:
(1) The office of the Attorney General;
(2) The office of the Governor;
(3) The Department of Labor and Licensing;
(4) The Department of Health;
(5) The Department of Human Services;
(6) The Arkansas Association of Chiefs of Police;
(7) The Arkansas Sheriffs' Association;
04-01-2025 12:43:46 CEB072

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB442
(8) The Division of Arkansas State Police;
(9) The Arkansas Prosecuting Attorneys Association;
(10) Local law enforcement; and
(11) Nongovernmental organizations such as:
(A) Those specializing in the problems of human
trafficking;
(B) Those representing diverse communities
disproportionally affected by human trafficking;
(C) Agencies devoted to child services and runaway
services; and
(D) Academic researchers dedicated to the subject of human
trafficking.
(c) If the task force is created by the Attorney General, he or she
may invite federal agencies that operate in the state to be members of the
task force, including without limitation:
(1) The Federal Bureau of Investigation;
(2) United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement; and
(3) The United States Department of Labor.
(d) If the task force is created by the Attorney General, the task
force shall:
(1) Develop a state plan;
(2) Coordinate the implementation of the state plan;
(3) Coordinate the collection and sharing of human trafficking
data among government agencies in a manner that ensures that the privacy of
victims of human trafficking is protected and that the data collection shall
respect the privacy of victims of human trafficking;
(4) Coordinate the sharing of information between agencies to
detect individuals and groups engaged in human trafficking;
(5) Explore the establishment of state policies for time limits
for the issuance of law enforcement agency endorsements as described in 8
C.F.R. § 214.11(f)(1), as it existed on January 1, 2013;
(6) Establish policies to enable state government to work with
nongovernmental organizations and other elements of the private sector to
prevent human trafficking and provide assistance to victims of human
trafficking who are United States citizens or foreign nationals;
(7) Evaluate various approaches used by state and local
04-01-2025 12:43:46 CEB072

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB442
governments to increase public awareness of human trafficking, including
trafficking of United States citizens and foreign national victims;
(8) Develop curriculum and train law enforcement agencies,
prosecutors, public defenders, judges, and others involved in the criminal
and juvenile justice systems on:
(A) Offenses under the Human Trafficking Act of 2013, § 5-
18-101 et seq.;
(B) Methods used in identifying victims of human
trafficking who are United States citizens or foreign nationals, including
preliminary interview techniques and appropriate questioning methods;
(C) Methods for prosecuting human traffickers;
(D) Methods of increasing effective collaboration with
nongovernmental organizations and other relevant social service organizations
in the course of investigating and prosecuting a human trafficking case;
(E) Methods for protecting the rights of victims of human
trafficking, taking into account the need to consider human rights and
special needs of women and minors;
(F) The necessity of treating victims of human trafficking
as crime victims rather than criminals; and
(G) Methods for promoting the safety of victims of human
trafficking; and
(9) Submit a report of its findings and recommendations to the
Governor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the President Pro
Tempore of the Senate.
SECTION 18. Arkansas Code Title 12, Chapter 19, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 2 — Human Trafficking Operations Unit

12-19-201. Human Trafficking Operations Unit — Creation — Duties.
(a) There is established a Human Trafficking Operations Unit within
the Division of Arkansas State Police.
(b) The Human Trafficking Operations Unit shall:
(1) Consist of commissioned officers and analysts of the
division;
(2) Support and initiate criminal investigations of human
trafficking, including sex trafficking and forced labor; and
04-01-2025 12:43:46 CEB072

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB442
(3) Support and initiate investigations involving missing
children that are considered high-risk victims.

12-19-202. Human Trafficking Coordinator — Creation — Duties.
(a) There is created the position of Human Trafficking Coordinator
within the Division of Arkansas State Police.
(b) The Human Trafficking Coordinator shall:
(1) Coordinate the implementation of this subchapter;
(2) Serve as a commissioned officer within the Division of
Arkansas State Police and perform duties as assigned;
(3) Supervise the Human Trafficking Operations Unit and Human
Trafficking Analyst;
(4) Evaluate state efforts to combat human trafficking and
identify areas for improvement;
(5) Collect data on human trafficking activity within the state
on an ongoing basis, including types of activities reported, efforts to
combat human trafficking, and impact on victims and on the state;
(6) Redact identifying information of any victim and his or her
family from all publicly released portions of the collected data;
(7) Promote public awareness about human trafficking, remedies
and services for victims, and hotline information;
(8) Create and maintain a website to publicize human trafficking
prevention efforts;
(9) Prepare and submit the annual report of the Human
Trafficking Operations Unit to the Game and Fish/State Police Subcommittee of
the Legislative Council, the Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth,
and the House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and
Military Affairs;
(10) Develop and implement policies pertaining to the use of the
Arkansas Human Trafficking Council Support Fund to support investigations and
services for victims of human trafficking in the state;
(11) Assist in the creation and operations of local human
trafficking task forces or working groups around the state, including serving
on a task force or a multidisciplinary child protection team;
(12) Prepare and submit applications for relevant available
grants that may enhance the investigation and prosecution of trafficking
04-01-2025 12:43:46 CEB072

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB442
offenses or to improve victim services to combat human trafficking within
this state; and
(13) Perform any other duties as required by the division.
(c)(1) The Human Trafficking Coordinator may seek input and assistance
from state agencies, nongovernmental agencies, service providers, and other
individuals in the performance of the duties of the Human Trafficking
Coordinator.
(2) Each state agency, board, and commission shall be required
to fully cooperate with the Human Trafficking Coordinator when assistance is
requested under subdivision (c)(1) of this section.
(3) Every investigation of a human trafficking offense shall be
reported to the Human Trafficking Coordinator by the initiating law
enforcement agency under guidelines established by the Human Trafficking
Coordinator.
(4) A state agency, nongovernmental agency, service provider, or
local or state law enforcement agency providing information to the Human
Trafficking Coordinator under this subchapter may disclose identifying
information regarding a minor victim to the Human Trafficking Coordinator for
the purposes of evaluating and collecting data regarding trafficking offenses
in the state.

12-19-203. Human Trafficking Analyst — Creation — Duties.
(a) There is created the position of Human Trafficking Analyst within
the Division of Arkansas State Police.
(b) The Human Trafficking Analyst shall:
(1) Provide the Human Trafficking Operations Unit with
objective, reliable, comparable, current data, and information in the field
of human trafficking;
(2) Direct support to a law enforcement officer investigating
human trafficking on all tips, reports of possible human trafficking, and
undercover operations; and
(3) Assist the Human Trafficking Coordinator with carrying out
the functions of the Human Trafficking Operations Unit.

SECTION 19. Arkansas Code § 19-5-1252(b) concerning the Safe Harbor
Fund for Sexually Exploited Children, is amended to read as follows:
04-01-2025 12:43:46 CEB072

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB442
(b) The fund shall consist of fines collected under § 5-18-103(d), § 5-
18-104(c), § 5-18-106(c), § 5-18-107(f), § 5-70-102(e), § 5-70-103(d), § 5-
70-104(c), § 5-70-105(c), § 5-70-106(c), and § 5-70-107(e) and any other
general revenues as may be authorized by law.

SECTION 20. Arkansas Code § 19-5-1261 is repealed.
19-5-1261. Human Trafficking Victim Support Fund — Definition.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be
known as the “Human Trafficking Victim Support Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of fees collected under § 5-5-501(d), fines
collected under § 5-18-103(d), § 5-18-104(c), § 5-18-106(c), § 5-18-107(f), §
5-70-102(e), § 5-70-103(d), § 5-70-104(c), § 5-70-105(c), § 5-70-106(c), and
§ 5-70-107(e), and any other revenues authorized by law.
(c)(1) The fund shall be administered by the Attorney General.
(2) The Attorney General shall use the fund to provide:
(A) Grants to nonprofit, religious, and other third-party
organizations that provide services and treatment, such as securing
residential housing, health services, and social services for victims of
human trafficking;
(B) Training and education related to human trafficking to
law enforcement; and
(C) For the management and operation of the fund.
(d) As used in this section, “victim of human trafficking” means a
person who has been subject to sexual exploitation because the person:
(1) Is a victim of trafficking of persons under § 5-18-103;
(2) Is a victim of child sex trafficking under 18 U.S.C. § 1591,
as it existed on January 1, 2017; or
(3) Engages in an act of prostitution under § 5-70-102 or sexual
solicitation under § 5-70-103 or § 5-70-107.

SECTION 21. Arkansas Code Title 19, Chapter 5, Subchapter 12, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
19-5-1288. Arkansas Human Trafficking Council Support Fund —
Definition.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
04-01-2025 12:43:46 CEB072

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB442
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the "Arkansas Human Trafficking Council Support Fund".
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Fees collected under § 5-5-501(d) and fines collected under
§§ 5-18-103(d), 5-18-104(c), 5-18-106(c), 5-18-107(f), 5-27-234(c), 5-70-
102(e), 5-70-103(d), 5-70-104(c), 5-70-105(c), 5-70-106(c), and 5-70-107(e);
(2) Moneys appropriated by the General Assembly;
(3) The interest accruing to the fund;
(4) Donations to the fund; and
(5) Any other revenues authorized by law.
(c)(1) The fund shall be administered by the Division of Arkansas
State Police.
(2) The division shall use the fund to provide:
(A) Services and treatment, such as securing residential
housing, advocacy and coordination, legal services, health services, and
social services for victims of human trafficking;
(B) Grants to nonprofit, religious, and other third-party
organizations that provide services and treatment, securing residential
housing, advocacy and coordination, legal services, health services, and
social services for victims of human trafficking;
(C) Training for the Human Trafficking Operations Unit;
(D) Equipment and supplies for the unit;
(E) Software and subscription licensing for the unit;
(F) Travel reimbursement and reconciliation for the unit;
(G) Outreach material for the unit; and
(H) Support for other duties of the unit prescribed by
law.
(3) The fund shall not be used to purchase motor vehicles or
emergency equipment for motor vehicles.
(d) As used in the section, "victim of human trafficking" means the
same as defined in § 5-18-102.

SECTION 22. DO NOT CODIFY. Temporary language.
(a) Any fund balance that remains in the Human Trafficking Victim
Support Fund, § 19-5-1261, shall be transferred to the Arkansas Human
Trafficking Council Support Fund.
04-01-2025 12:43:46 CEB072

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB442
(b) Any fund balance that remains in the Safe Harbor Fund for Sexually
Exploited Children, § 19-5-1252, shall be transferred to the Arkansas Human
Trafficking Council Support Fund.

/s/J. Bryant































04-01-2025 12:43:46 CEB072